Tennessee, session 114, SB2490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-107(d), is amended by deleting
"The development of such demonstration project shall begin on July 1, 1982.".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2490
012613
- 1 -